Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/lv_LV.aff
SFX % Y 276
SFX %   0   oša      [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   ošā      [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   ošai     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   ošais    [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   ošajā    [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   ošajai   [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   ošajam   [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   ošajām   [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   ošajās   [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   ošajiem  [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   ošajos   [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   ošam     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   ošām     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   ošas     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   ošās     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oši      [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   ošie     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   ošiem    [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   ošo      [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   ošos     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   ošs      [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   ošu      [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   ošus     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   ams      [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   ama      [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amā      [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amai     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amais    [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amajā    [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amajai   [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amajam   [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amajām   [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amajās   [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amajiem  [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amajos   [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amam     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amām     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amas     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amās     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   ami      [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amie     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amiem    [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amo      [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amos     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amu      [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   amus     [^gkr]t
SFX %   0   oša      [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   ošā      [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   ošai     [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   ošais    [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   ošajā    [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   ošajai   [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   ošajam   [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   ošajām   [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   ošajās   [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   ošajiem  [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   ošajos   [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   ošam     [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   ošām     [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   ošas     [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   ošās     [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   oši      [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   ošie     [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   ošiem    [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   ošo      [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   ošos     [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   ošs      [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   ošu      [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   ošus     [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   ams      [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   ama      [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   amā      [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   amai     [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   amais    [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   amajā    [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   amajai   [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   amajam   [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   amajām   [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   amajās   [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   amajiem  [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   amajos   [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   amam     [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   amām     [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   amas     [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   amās     [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   ami      [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   amie     [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   amiem    [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   amo      [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   amos     [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   amu      [^āē][r]t
SFX %   0   amus     [^āē][r]t
SFX %   gt   dzoša      [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzošā      [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzošai     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzošais    [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzošajā    [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzošajai   [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzošajam   [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzošajām   [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzošajās   [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzošajiem  [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzošajos   [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzošam     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzošām     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzošas     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzošās     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzoši      [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzošie     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzošiem    [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzošo      [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzošos     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzošs      [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzošu      [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzošus     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzams      [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzama      [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamā      [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamai     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamais    [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamajā    [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamajai   [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamajam   [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamajām   [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamajās   [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamajiem  [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamajos   [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamam     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamām     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamas     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamās     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzami      [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamie     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamiem    [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamo      [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamos     [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamu      [g]t
SFX %   gt   dzamus     [g]t
SFX %   kt   coša      [k]t
SFX %   kt   cošā      [k]t
SFX %   kt   cošai     [k]t
SFX %   kt   cošais    [k]t
SFX %   kt   cošajā    [k]t
SFX %   kt   cošajai   [k]t
SFX %   kt   cošajam   [k]t
SFX %   kt   cošajām   [k]t
SFX %   kt   cošajās   [k]t
SFX %   kt   cošajiem  [k]t
SFX %   kt   cošajos   [k]t
SFX %   kt   cošam     [k]t
SFX %   kt   cošām     [k]t
SFX %   kt   cošas     [k]t
SFX %   kt   cošās     [k]t
SFX %   kt   coši      [k]t
SFX %   kt   cošie     [k]t
SFX %   kt   cošiem    [k]t
SFX %   kt   cošo      [k]t
SFX %   kt   cošos     [k]t
SFX %   kt   cošs      [k]t
SFX %   kt   cošu      [k]t
SFX %   kt   cošus     [k]t
SFX %   kt   cams      [k]t
SFX %   kt   cama      [k]t
SFX %   kt   camā      [k]t
SFX %   kt   camai     [k]t
SFX %   kt   camais    [k]t
SFX %   kt   camajā    [k]t
SFX %   kt   camajai   [k]t
SFX %   kt   camajam   [k]t
SFX %   kt   camajām   [k]t
SFX %   kt   camajās   [k]t
SFX %   kt   camajiem  [k]t
SFX %   kt   camajos   [k]t
SFX %   kt   camam     [k]t
SFX %   kt   camām     [k]t
SFX %   kt   camas     [k]t
SFX %   kt   camās     [k]t
SFX %   kt   cami      [k]t
SFX %   kt   camie     [k]t
SFX %   kt   camiem    [k]t
SFX %   kt   camo      [k]t
SFX %   kt   camos     [k]t
SFX %   kt   camu      [k]t
SFX %   kt   camus     [k]t
SFX %   ārt   aroša      [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   arošā      [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   arošai     [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   arošais    [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   arošajā    [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   arošajai   [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   arošajam   [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   arošajām   [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   arošajās   [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   arošajiem  [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   arošajos   [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   arošam     [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   arošām     [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   arošas     [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   arošās     [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   aroši      [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   arošie     [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   arošiem    [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   arošo      [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   arošos     [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   arošs      [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   arošu      [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   arošus     [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   arams      [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   arama      [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   aramā      [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   aramai     [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   aramais    [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   aramajā    [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   aramajai   [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   aramajam   [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   aramajām   [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   aramajās   [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   aramajiem  [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   aramajos   [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   aramam     [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   aramām     [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   aramas     [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   aramās     [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   arami      [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   aramie     [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   aramiem    [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   aramo      [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   aramos     [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   aramu      [ā]rt
SFX %   ārt   aramus     [ā]rt
SFX %   ērt   eroša      [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   erošā      [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   erošai     [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   erošais    [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   erošajā    [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   erošajai   [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   erošajam   [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   erošajām   [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   erošajās   [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   erošajiem  [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   erošajos   [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   erošam     [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   erošām     [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   erošas     [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   erošās     [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   eroši      [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   erošie     [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   erošiem    [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   erošo      [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   erošos     [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   erošs      [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   erošu      [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   erošus     [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   erams      [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   erama      [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   eramā      [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   eramai     [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   eramais    [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   eramajā    [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   eramajai   [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   eramajam   [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   eramajām   [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   eramajās   [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   eramajiem  [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   eramajos   [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   eramam     [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   eramām     [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   eramas     [ē]rt
